Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1416
Sections; purpose; terms, defined.

The purpose of sections 66-1416 to 66-1419 is to provide an additional method of collecting motor fuels taxes from interstate motor vehicle operators commensurate with their operations in Nebraska and to permit the department to suspend the collection as to transportation entering Nebraska from any other state when it appears that Nebraska tax revenue and interstate highway transportation moving out of Nebraska will not be unduly prejudiced thereby.

For purposes of such sections, (1) fuel used or consumed in operations includes all fuel placed in the supply tanks and consumed in the engine of a qualified motor vehicle and (2) qualified motor vehicle means a motor vehicle used, designed, or maintained for transportation of persons or property which (a) has two axles and a gross vehicle weight or registered gross vehicle weight exceeding twenty-six thousand pounds, (b) has three or more axles regardless of weight, or (c) is used in combination when the weight of such combination exceeds twenty-six thousand pounds gross vehicle or registered gross vehicle weight. Qualified motor vehicle does not include a recreational vehicle.

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 61.